dictsource/ca_rules
      A) r (-A           **   // final r is not silent if followed by a pronoun
      A) r (-hA          **   // final r is not silent if followed by a pronoun
         r (_$w_alt4+    R   // final r is not silent (motor)
         
?3   A)  r (_+           ** // final r is not silent
?3   A)  r (s_+          **=// final r is not silent + stress the vowel
?3 L05J) r (s_+          ** // final r is not silent + do not stress the vowel

?4    A) r (_$w_alt4+    =   // final r is always silent (motor)       
?4       r (s_$w_alt4+   =    // final r is always silent (motor)       
?4    A) r (-l+          l   // final r is assimilated if followed by a pronoun
?4    A) r (-t+          t   // final r is assimilated if followed by a pronoun
?4    A) r (-m+          m   // final r is assimilated if followed by a pronoun
?4    A) r (-s+          t   // final r is assimilated if followed by a pronoun

         r (_A$w_alt4+   **   // final r is not silent (motor acústic)
         r (_hA$w_alt4+  **   // final r is not silent (motor hidràulic)
        
         r (s_$w_alt4+   R   // final r is not silent
?3       r (s_$w_alt4+   **   // final r is not silent

?6       r (_$w_alt4+   Rt  // final r is not silent (cor)
?6       r (_$w_alt4+   Rt   // final r is not silent (cor)
    
                // suffixes with final R not silent
  L05Jfo)  r   (_        R
  L05Jfe)  r   (_        R
  L05Jco)  r   (_        R
  L05Jge)  r   (_        R
  L05Jpa)  r   (_        R
  L05Jte)  r   (_        R
  L05Jme)  r   (_        R
  L05Jto)  r   (_        R
 L05Jpte)  r   (_        R
 
  L05Jfo)  r   (s_       R
  L05Jfe)  r   (s_       R
  L05Jco)  r   (s_       R
  L05Jge)  r   (s_       R
  L05Jpa)  r   (s_       R
  L05Jte)  r   (s_       R
  L05Jme)  r   (s_       R
  L05Jto)  r   (s_       R
 L05Jpte)  r   (s_       R
  
   // silent consonants
      A)   rt (_         R    // (art)
      A)   rd (_         R    // (record)

      A)   rt (_A        Rt   // (art abstracte)
      A)   rd (_A        Rt   // (record abstracte)
      A)   rt (_C        R    // (art contemporani)
      A)   rd (_C        R    // (record tormentós)

      A)   rt (s_        R    // (arts)
      A)   rd (s_        R    // (records)
        
   // accent variants  
?1    A)   rt (_$w_alt4  Rt   // (sort)
?1    A)   rd (_$w_alt4  Rt   // (sord)
?1    A)   rt (_C$w_alt4 R    // (sort)
?1    A)   rd (_C$w_alt4 R    // (sord)    

?4    A)   rt (_$w_alt4  **t  // (sort)
?4    A)   rd (_$w_alt4  **t  // (sord)


?3    A)   rt (_      **t     // (art)
?3    A)   rt (_A     **t     // (art amic)
?3    A)   rt (s_     **t     // (arts) 
?3    A)   rt (_C     **      // (art bonic)
?3    A)   rd (_      **d     // (record)
?3    A)   rd (_A     **d     // (record amic)
?3    A)   rd (s_     **d     // (record)
?3    A)   rd (_C     **      // (record bonic)


?4    A)   rt (_     **    // (art)
?4    A)   rd (_     **    // (record)
?4    A)   rt (_A    **t   // (art abstracte)
?4    A)   rd (_A    **t   // (record abstracte)
?4    A)   rt (_C    **    // (art contemporani)
?4    A)   rd (_C    **    // (record tormentós) 
?4    A)   rc (_C    **    // (porc petit)
?4    A)   rp (_C    **    // (serp grossa)
?4    A)   rt (s_    **    // (arts)
?4    A)   rd (s_    **    // (records)
?4    A)   rt (_C$w_alt4     **    // (sort)
?4    A)   rd (_C$w_alt4     **    // (sord)

?5    A)   rs (A       lts
?5    A)   rs (K       lts
?5    A)   rt (_+      lt     // (art)
?5    A)   rt (_A+     lt     // (art amic)
?5    A)   rt (s_+     lt     // (arts) 
?5    A)   rt (_C+     lt      // (art bonic)
?5    A)   rd (_+      ld     // (record)
?5    A)   rd (_A+     ld     // (record amic)
?5    A)   rd (s_+     ld     // (record)
?5    A)   rd (_C+     lt      // (record bonic)

.group s
        s          s
     _) s' (P2     s    // apostrophe
        ss         s
        sc (L01    s    // (piscina, escena)
?4      sc (L01    ts   // (piscina, escena)
        sj         Z    // (cisjordània)
        sx         S    // (desxifrar)
        A) s  (A   z

     A) s  (-hA    z
     
     A) s  (-A     z
     A) s  (-L11   z
        
        s  (L11    z
     -) se (_      se
        
?1  aque) s  (t_
    aque) s  (ts_
    aque) s  (t_A   s
    aque) s  (t_hA  s
    aque) s  (t_C
    
       A) st (_C    =s
?4     A) st (_C    =t   // post
    

      _a) s (imetri s    // (asimetria)
      _a) s (imètri s    // (asimètriques)
     _bi) s (A      s    // (bisexual)
    _bio) s (A      s    // (bioseguretat)
    _eco) s (A      s    // (ecosistema)
    _neo) s (A      s    // ()
   _orto) s (A      s    // 
   _ante) s (A      s    // (antesala)
  _anglo) s (A      s    // (anglosaxó)
   _anti) s (A      s    // (antisocial)
   _auto) s (A      s    // (autorservei)
     _bi) s (A      s    // (bisecció)
 _contra) s (A      s    // (contrasentit)
  _entre) s (A      s    // (entresòl)
   _fito) s (A      s    // (fitosanitari)
   _idio) s (A      s    // (idiosincràcia)
   _mini) s (A      s    // (minisèrie)
   _mono) s (A      s    // (monosíl·lab)
  _multi) s (A      s    // (multisala)
   _homo) s (A      s    // (homosexual)
   _para) s (A      s    // (parasíntesi)
       @) s (òl     s    // (entresòl)@) s (òl     s    // (entresòl)
  _entre) s (ol     s    // (entresolar)
  _sobre) s (ol     s    // (sobresolar)
       @) s (exual  s    // (bisexualitat)
   _para) s (it     z    // (parasitosi)
  _sobre) s (A      s    // (sobresortir)
   _tele) s (A      s    // (telestrella)
    _pre) s (elecci s    // (preselecció)
     _re) s (itua   s    // (resituar)
  _ultra) s (A      s    // (ultrasò)
    _uni) s (A      s    // (unisexual)
   _vice) s (A      s    // (vicesecretari)
   _tran) s (A      z    // (transitar)
   _tràn) s (A      z    // (transitar)
  _enfon) s (a      z    // (enfonsar)
  
          sh        S    // foreign words
          
   // balearic assimilation and dissimilation
?4  Aix_) s         ts   // dissimilation (peix salat)
?4    s_) s         ts   // (dos sacs)

?4     A) s (_s     t    // pronounce -s as -t if followed by an s (dos sacs)
?4     A) s (_z     d    // pronounce -s as -d if followed by an z (sis zones)
?4     A) s (_cL01  t    // pronounce -s as -t  if followed by -ce/ci 
?4     A) s (-cL01  t    // pronounce -s as -t  if followed by -ce/ci
?4     A) s (_x     t    // dissimilation (mateix xarop)
?4     A) s (_j     d    // dissimilation (mateix joc)
?4     A) s (_gL01  d    // dissimilation (mateix gerro)
?4     A) s (_l     l    // dissimilation (es literat)
?4     A) s (_ll    l^   // dissimilation (dos llits)
?4     A) s (_r           // dissimilation (dos rius)

 ?4 Aig_) s         ts
 ?4 Atx_) s         ts

   // balearic elision
?4  AL04) s (_C          // semivowel + s + _ + consonant (feis cas, caus molt)
?4  AL04) s (_hA   s     // avoid elision
?4 L16ui) s (_C    s     // avoid elision

?4        s (L13_C       // s + plosive + _ + consonant (post de planxar)
?4        s (c_C         // s + c + _ + consonant (casc petit)

?4     C) s (_C          // consonant + s + _ + consonant (caps petits)
?4     C) s (_hA    s    // avoid elision

.group t
        t          t
     _) t' (P2     t    // apostrophe
        tg (L01    dZ   // (metge)
        tj         dZ   // (mitjà)
        tx         tS   // (esquitx)
        tz         dz   // (dotzena)
        ts         ts   // (lletsó)
        tll        l^l^ // gemination (espatlla)
?3      tll        l^   // assimilation (espatlla)
?3      tl         ll   // ametla, atlas
?4      tll        ll   // assimilation (espatlla)
?5      tll (++    l    // (espatlla)
        
        tm         mm	// gemination (setmana)
   _so) tm         dm   // avoid gemination (sotmès)
?3      tm         m	// not gemination (setmana)
?5      tm         m	// not gemination (setmana)
        tn         nn	// gemination (cotna)
?3   i) tz (a      z    // (normalitzar) 
     i) tz (a      tz   // (normalitzar) 
        tt         t

?4   A) tx (_L13    i   // (vaig portar) 
?4   A) tx (_L14    t   // (vaig portar) 

.group u
        u          u
     A) u (K       w    // glide
     A) u (A       w    // glide
        uu         uw   // glide
        u (i       u    // not a glide
        u (ï       u    // not a glide
        uïx        uiS  // (traduïx)
        
?3      ui         wi   // (hui, huit)
?3      uix        ujS  // (bruixa)
?3      uig        udZ  // (rebuig)
        
L05Ji)  u (s_      u    // not a glide (Màrius)
?5   A) u (_       u
?5   A) u (s_      u

            // prefixes with secondary stress
   _p)  u (ig      ,u    // (puigmal)
   _s)  u (per@    ,u    // (supermercat)
   _s)  u (pra@    ,u    // (suprarenal)
   _t)  u (rbo@    ,u    // (turboautomòbil)
    _)  u (ltra@   ,u    // 
        u (ltraC   ,u    // (ultrasò)
        u (ltraA   ,u    // (ultraaudió)
        
            // no secondary stress
   _p)  u (ig$w_alt5      ,u    // (puigmal)
   _s)  u (per@$w_alt5    ,u    // (supermercat)
   _s)  u (pra@$w_alt5    ,u    // (suprarenal)
   _t)  u (rbo@$w_alt5    ,u    // (turboautomòbil)
    _)  u (ltra@$w_alt5   ,u    // (ultradreta)
    
?6   L05C)  ua  (_     u   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6   L05CC) ua  (_     u   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6   L05C)  ue  (s_    u   // avoid esdrúixoles
?6   L05CC) ue  (s_    u   // avoid esdrúixoles
    
.group v
       v          b
?3     v          v
?4     v          v
?5     v          v
 
.group w
       w          b
?3     w          v


.group x
         x         ks   // (taxi)
         xt (_     ks   // (text)
     _e) x  (A     gz   // (examen)
   _coe) x  (A     gz   // (coexistir)
    
     _è) x  (A     gz   // (èxode)
     _e) x  (L11   gz   
    
     _A) x  (A     ks   // (oxigen)
     _A) x  (L10   ks   // unvoiced consonant (excampió) 
     _A) xj        gZ   // (exjutge)
     _A) xg (L01   gZ   // (exgeneral)
     _A) xs        ks   // (exsecretari)
         xc (L01   ks   // (excedeix)
        
?4   _A) x  (A     dZ   // (exàmen)
?4   _e) x  (A     dZ   // (exàmen)
        
?4 Aix_) x         tS   // dissimilation (mateix xarop)
?4   s_) x         tS   // (compres xarop)
?4   ç_) x         tS   // (llaç xamós)
?4 Aig_) x         tS
?4 Atx_) x         tS

?5       x         z   // (taxi)
?5   _e) x  (A     z   // (examen)
?5 _coe) x  (A     z   // (coexistir)
    
?5   _è) x  (A     z   // (èxode)
?5   _e) x  (L11   z   
    
?5   _A) x  (A     z   //
?5   _o) x  (i     s   // (oxigen)
?5 _parado) x      s   // (paradoxal)
?5   _A) x  (L10   s   // unvoiced consonant (excampió) 
?5   _A) xj        Z   // (exjutge)
?5   _A) xg (L01   gZ   // (exgeneral)
?5   _A) xs        s   // (exsecretari)
?5       xc (L01   s   // (excedeix)


?6   t_) x         tS
     
   _L05) x (A       ks   
      K) x          S    // (linx)

.group y
         y          i
         y (A       j


.group z
         z         z
         zs        s

?4 Aix_) z         dz    // dissimilation (sis zones)
?4   s_) z         dz    // (mateix zero)
?4   ç_) z         dz    // (llaç zenital)
?4 Aig_) z         dZ
?4 Atx_) z         dZ

.group
         à         ''a   // force stress onto this vowel
         é         ''e
         è         ''E
         í         ''i
         ó         ''o
         ò         ''O
    
         ú         ''u
         ï         ''i
         ŀ         l
         ü         u
      g) ü         w
         ñ         n^

         $         dolaR
        
?4       è         ''@     // wordlist: balearic stressed @
?4       é ($w_alt5++ ''@  // wordlist: balearic stressed @
